Utah statutes.
77-32-301.   Minimum standards for defense of an indigent.

Each county, city, and town shall provide for the defense of an indigent in criminal cases in the courts and various administrative bodies of the state in accordance with the following minimum standards:

(1)  provide counsel for each indigent who faces the substantial probability of the deprivation of the indigent's liberty;

(2)  afford timely representation by competent legal counsel;

(3)  provide the investigatory resources necessary for a complete defense;

(4)  assure undivided loyalty of defense counsel to the client;

(5)  proceed with a first appeal of right; and

(6)  prosecute other remedies before or after a conviction, considered by defense counsel to be in the interest of justice except for other and subsequent discretionary appeals or discretionary writ proceedings.

